Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 3. Leasing of Land Other Than for the Extraction of Natural Resources.
Sec. 38.05.097.
Exemption from rental payments on land leased by nonprofit organizations.

A nonprofit organization using state land leased by it under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

and

38.05.810

for a youth encampment or similar recreational purpose is exempt from lease rental payments on that land. The nonprofit organization shall meet all other terms and conditions of the lease specified under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

and

38.05.810

.

A nonprofit organization which satisfies the requirements of this section that is using land under a lease in effect before July 1, 1978 may convert its lease to a new lease with terms exempting it from the payment of rent by submitting a written request to the director.

In this section, “nonprofit organization” means nonprofit corporations, associations, clubs, or societies organized and operated exclusively for charitable, religious, scientific, or educational purposes or for the promotion of social welfare and which have received an exemption from the payment of federal income tax.

History.

(§ 11 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 30 ch 113 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were formerly (c) and (b) respectively. Relettered in 1989.

Administrative Code. —

For short title and definitions, see 11 AAC 58, art. 4.

Sec. 38.05.098.
Senior citizens exemption.

The real property occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident 65 years of age or over and leased by that resident from the state in accordance with AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

is exempt from the payment of annual lease rent. Only one exemption may be granted for the same property, and, if two or more persons are eligible for an exemption for the same property the parties shall decide between or among themselves which shall receive the benefit of the exemption. An exemption may not be granted for a portion of the leased real property which is used for a purpose other than as the permanent place of abode of the leaseholder.

An exemption may not be granted under this section unless a written application for the exemption on a form provided for by the commissioner is submitted. The leaseholder must submit the application not later than 60 days before the anniversary date of the lease, and shall file a separate application for each lease year for which the exemption is sought. If an application is submitted within the required time and is approved by the commissioner, the commissioner shall allow a rental exemption for the lease year commencing on the anniversary date. The commissioner may at any time require proof of the right to an exemption claimed under this section.

History.

(§ 32 ch 85 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

In rewriting subsection (b) to remove personal pronouns, the phrase “in the form he considers necessary” was deleted from the last sentence.
AS

38.05.020

gives the commissioner authority to prescribe the form and extent of proof required under this section.

Sec. 38.05.100.
Renewal of lease. [Repealed, § 15 ch 257 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 38.05.102.
Lessee preference.

If land within a leasehold created under AS

38.05.070

—

38.05.105

is offered for sale or long-term lease at the termination of the existing leasehold, the director may, upon a finding that it is in the best interest of the state, allow the holder in good standing of that leasehold to purchase or lease the land for its appraised fair market value at the time of the sale or long-term lease.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 257 SLA 1976; am § 31 ch 113 SLA 1981; am § 100 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

AS

38.05.102

was added by both § 2, ch. 36, SLA 1976, and § 7, ch. 257, SLA 1976.
Since ch. 257 had a later effective date, and contained inconsistent provisions, it was treated as an amendment to the section enacted by ch. 36.

Sec. 38.05.103.
Rights of holder of security interest.

If there is a breach or default of a term of a lease or of the provisions of this chapter relating to a lease, the division shall provide written notice of the breach or default by personal service or by registered or certified mail to the lessee and to any holder of record having a security interest in the leased property. The notice shall also make demand upon the lessee to cure or remedy the breach or default within 60 days from the date of receipt of the notice and demand. If a lessee fails to cure or remedy the breach or default within 60 days, or within the additional time which the division may allow for good cause, the state may, subject to (b) of this section, exercise any right which it may have at law or as set out in the lease.

If a lessee fails to cure or remedy a breach or default within the time allowed in (a) of this section, a holder of a security interest who has received notice under (a) of this section may cure or remedy the breach or default if the breach or default can be cured by the payment of money or, if this cannot be done, by performing or undertaking in writing to perform the terms, covenants, restrictions and conditions of the lease capable of performance by the holder. The holder shall act within 60 days from the date of receipt of notice under (a) of this section, or within an additional period as the director may allow for good cause.

History.

(§ 10 ch 138 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The lease conversion provisions enacted by 1977 legislation (§§ 12, 13, ch. 138, SLA 1977, as amended by § 21, ch. 182, SLA 1978) applied only to those leases entered into under the substantive statutory provisions which were amended by the 1977 legislation.
Hence, substantive amendments to AS 38.05 could not be applied to a lease which was not authorized by the leasing provisions of AS 38.05, but rather by the leasing provisions of AS 38.35, and the state was not estopped from challenging the validity of the terms of a wrongfully converted lease. December 10, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.105.
Periodic rent adjustments.

Each lease shall stipulate that at five-year intervals as specified in the lease the annual rent payment or other form of lease compensation specified by the commissioner is subject to adjustment. Changes or adjustments shall be based primarily on changes in the lease’s fair market value. However, if the commissioner determines that single-family residential development is the best use of the land, the reappraisal period may be lengthened or the readjustment waived in accordance with regulations adopted by the department. Before a waiver of rent adjustment is issued, the land shall have a current reappraisal. A waiver is valid only if single-family residential development actually occurs. The regulations adopted under this section shall ensure that the state receives a fair return from the land.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

Changes or adjustments of annual rent on land under lease and used for single-family residential purposes in an area zoned for commercial or other nonresidential uses shall be based on an adjusted fair market value determined by reference to the actual use of the property and not by reference to the other uses permissible under the zoning ordinance.

History.

(§ 7 art V ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1964; am § 8 ch 257 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 267 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 138 SLA 1977; am §§ 12, 13 ch 182 SLA 1978; am §§ 17, 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

AS

38.05.105(a)

was amended by both § 8, ch. 257, SLA 1976, and § 1, ch. 267, SLA 1976.
Since the two amendments appear to be inconsistent, and ch. 257 is superseded by ch. 267, only the later enactment has been given effect here.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The lease conversion provisions enacted by 1977 legislation (§§ 12, 13, ch. 138, SLA 1977, as amended by § 21, ch. 182, SLA 1978) applied only to those leases entered into under the substantive statutory provisions which were amended by the 1977 legislation.
Hence, substantive amendments to AS 38.05 could not be applied to a lease which was not authorized by the leasing provisions of AS 38.05, but rather by the leasing provisions of AS 38.35, and the state was not estopped from challenging the validity of the terms of a wrongfully converted lease. December 10, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.05.107.
Compensation relating to easements or rights-of-way across state leases. [Repealed, § 1 ch 203 SLA 1975.]